Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DATA CENTER MORATORIUM.new text end new text begin (a) For the purpose of this section, "data center" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, sections 216B.02, subdivision 11. Data center includes a qualified large-scale data center, as defined in section 297A.68, subdivision 42, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (b) The state or a local government must not issue a permit, including a conditional use permit, for a data center until one calendar year after the Public Utility Commission submits a comprehensive report that assesses various possible scenarios for data center development in Minnesota. The report must be submitted to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over energy and environment no later than July 1, 2027. If the report is not completed by July 1, 2027, the commission may extend the submission date to no later than January 1, 2028. new text end new text begin (c) In addition to assessing various possible scenarios for data center development, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) include findings with respect to: new text end new text begin (i) data center energy usage; new text end new text begin (ii) data center water usage; new text end new text begin (iii) data center metals usage; new text end new text begin (iv) localized impacts by data centers; new text end new text begin (v) data center impacts on federal- and state-listed species, and species of special concern; and new text end new text begin (vi) data center impacts on Tribal Nations' treaty rights, resources, and cultural practices; new text end new text begin (2) analyze how and for what purpose data centers built in Minnesota are being used; new text end new text begin (3) analyze the economic impact data centers have at the local level. The analysis must include the impact on: new text end new text begin (i) employment; new text end new text begin (ii) property taxes; and new text end new text begin (iii) economic activity; new text end new text begin (4) analyze the economic impact data centers have at the state level. The analysis must include: new text end new text begin (i) the amount of income tax revenue generated from jobs created by data centers; new text end new text begin (ii) the amount of tax expenditures, as defined in section 270C.11, subdivision 6, provided to data centers; and new text end new text begin (iii) other potential economic impacts; new text end new text begin (5) identify suitable locations for data centers that minimize disruption to residential areas, limit the impacts on residential utility infrastructure, and ensure data centers are not concentrated in one region. When considering suitable locations, the report must consider: new text end new text begin (i) whether existing infrastructure is available and suitable for data center use, in order to eliminate the need to construct new infrastructure; and new text end new text begin (ii) the cumulative impacts on water use, noise, and light; and new text end new text begin (6) analyze other data center-related risks that are identified through no fewer than two public comment periods. new text end new text begin (d) The commission must consult with Minnesota Tribal governments when creating the report. new text end new text begin (e) A third-party contractor hired to develop the report must complete a conflict of interest evaluation to ensure the contractor does not work for or receive funding from a data center developer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end